West Virginia, session 2026, HB4247.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 7. Authorization for Department of revenue to promulgate legislative rules. §64-7-1. Insurance Commissioner. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on April 16, 2025, authorized under the authority of §33-2-10 of this code, modified by the Insurance Commissioner to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on August 21, 2025, relating to the Insurance Commissioner (credit for reinsurance, 114 CSR 40), is authorized.